Utah statutes.
63G-13-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Commission" means the Utah Commission on Immigration and Migration created in Section 63G-13-201.

(2)  "Migrant worker" means an individual who leaves the individual's country of origin for employment of a seasonal or other temporary nature.

(3)  "Pilot project" means the pilot project created under Part 3, Migrant Worker Visa Pilot Project, with the State of Nuevo Leon, Mexico.

(4)  "Pilot project memorandum of understanding" means the memorandum of understanding described in Section 63G-13-301.

(5) (a)  "State agency" means an executive, legislative, and judicial branch department, agency, board, commission, or division, or other administrative unit of the state.

(b)  "State agency" includes a state institution of higher education as defined in Section 53B-3-102.

(6)  "United States nonimmigrant visa" means a visa issued by the federal government as provided in 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101 and 1184.



Enacted by Chapter 19, 2011 General Session

